Arkansas, session 2025, SB89.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-11-129(a)(1), concerning the requirement
that school districts make certain information easily identifiable and
accessible, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Each school district shall make the following information and
data easily identified on its website or the website of the school district's
education service cooperative, if the education service cooperative maintains
the school district's website:
(A) Current comprehensive financial data reports for
school districts, including:
(i) Local and state revenue sources;
(ii) Administrator and teacher salary and benefit
expenditure data;
(iii) School district balances, including legal
balances and building fund balances;
*TNL106*
02-05-2025 10:28:54 TNL106

As Engrossed: S1/27/25 S2/5/25 SB89
(iv) Minutes of regular, emergency, and special
meetings of the school district board of directors that shall be posted no
later than twenty-four (24) hours following the approval of the minutes at a
regular, emergency, or special meeting of the school district board of
directors;
(v) The school district budget for the ensuing year,
which shall be posted on the website within thirty (30) days following the
date required to be submitted to the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education;
(vi) A financial breakdown of monthly expenses of
the school district;
(vii) Salary schedules for all employees, including
extended contract and supplementary pay amounts;
(viii) Current contract information with all school
district employees, except that Social Security numbers, telephone numbers,
personal addresses, or signatures shall not be published;
(ix) The annual budget of the school district; and
(x) The annual school district statistical report;
and
(xi) Agendas of regular meetings of the school
district board of directors that shall be posted no later than twenty-four
(24) hours before each regular meeting of the school district board of
directors;
(xii) Agendas of special or emergency meetings of
the school district board of directors that shall be posted no later than two
(2) hours before each special or emergency meeting of the school district
board of directors; and
(xiii) The names and email addresses of all members
of the school district board of directors, including the respective
positions, if zoned, and terms of office of the members of the school
district board of directors; and
(B) Each school district's personnel policies required
under § 6-17-201 et seq. and § 6-17-2301 et seq.

/s/J. English

02-05-2025 10:28:54 TNL106